Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.025

Internship clock hours—Rules.

The professional educator standards board shall establish rules for awarding clock hours for participation of certificated personnel in internships with business, industry, or government. To receive clock hours for an internship, the individual must demonstrate that the internship will provide beneficial skills and knowledge in an area directly related to his or her current assignment, or to his or her assignment for the following school year. An individual may not receive more than the equivalent of two college quarter credits for internships during a calendar-year period. The total number of credits for internships that an individual may earn to advance on the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee or its successor agency is limited to the equivalent of fifteen college quarter credits.

[ 2006 c 263 s 810; 1995 c 284 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Findings—1995 c 284: "The legislature finds that if students are to succeed in an increasingly competitive economy, they will need to be taught by teachers who are aware of the technological innovations and changes that are occurring throughout business, industry, and government. Having teachers who are more aware of these changes will lead to improvements in curriculum and instruction, thereby making public schools more relevant to the future career and personal needs of our students." [ 1995 c 284 s 1.]